Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 423, as last
amended by Section 8, Chapter 182, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 423), is amended to read as follows:
Section 423. A. The Oklahoma Medical Marijuana Authority shall
make available on its website in an easy-to-find location an
application for a medical marijuana processing license. The
Authority shall be authorized to issue two types of medical
marijuana processor licenses based on the level of risk posed by the
type of processing conducted:
1. Nonhazardous medical marijuana processor license; and
2. Hazardous medical marijuana processor license.
The application fee for a nonhazardous or hazardous medical
marijuana processor license shall be paid by the applicant in the
amounts provided for in Section 427.14 of this title. A method of
payment shall be provided on the website of the Authority. The

Authority shall have ninety (90) business days to review the
application; approve, reject, or deny the application; and send the
approval, rejection, or denial letter stating the reasons for the
rejection or denial to the applicant in the same method the
application was submitted to the Authority.
B. The Authority shall approve all applications which meet the
following criteria:
1. The applicant must be twenty-five (25) years of age or
older;
2. The applicant, if applying as an individual, must show
residency in this state;
3. All applying entities must show that all members, managers,
and board members are Oklahoma residents of this state;
4. An applying entity may show ownership of nonstate residents,
but that percentage ownership may not exceed twenty-five percent
(25%);
5. All applying individuals or entities must be registered to
conduct business in this state; and
6. All applicants must disclose all ownership interests in the
processing operation.
Applicants with a nonviolent felony conviction in the last two
(2) years, any other felony conviction in the last five (5) years,
inmates in the custody of the Department of Corrections or any
person currently incarcerated shall not qualify for a medical
marijuana processing license.
C. 1. A licensed processor may take marijuana plants and
distill or process these plants into concentrates, edibles, and
other forms for consumption.
2. The Executive Director of the Authority shall make available
a set of standards which shall be used by licensed processors in the
preparation of edible marijuana products. The standards should be
in line with current food preparation guidelines. No excessive or
punitive rules may be established by the Executive Director.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4454 Page 2

3. Up to two times a year, the Authority may inspect a
processing operation and determine its compliance with the
preparation standards. If deficiencies are found, a written report
of the deficiency shall be issued to the licensed processor. The
licensed processor shall have one (1) month to correct the
deficiency or be subject to a fine of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00)
for each deficiency.
4. A licensed processor may sell marijuana products it creates
to a licensed dispensary or any other licensed processor. All sales
by a licensed processor shall be considered wholesale sales and
shall not be subject to taxation.
5. Under no circumstances may a licensed processor sell
marijuana or any marijuana product directly to a licensed medical
marijuana patient or licensed caregiver. However, a licensed
processor may process cannabis into a concentrated form for a
licensed medical marijuana patient for a fee.
6. Licensed processors shall be required to complete a monthly
yield and sales report to the Authority. This report shall be due
on the fifteenth of each month and shall provide reporting on the
previous month. This report shall detail the amount of marijuana
and medical marijuana products purchased in pounds, the amount of
marijuana cooked or processed in pounds, and the amount of waste in
pounds. Additionally, this report shall show total wholesale sales
in dollars. The Authority shall have oversight and auditing
responsibilities to ensure that all marijuana being processed is
accounted for.
7. Packages of edible medical marijuana products processed,
produced, packaged, or transferred by licensed medical marijuana
processors shall clearly indicate the number of servings of
tetrahydrocannabinol in each package and the amount of
tetrahydrocannabinol in each individual serving. Drinks or
beverages shall clearly indicate on the container the number of
servings in each drink or beverage and the amount of
tetrahydrocannabinol in each individual serving. Edible medical
marijuana products shall not:
a. be attractive to children. As used in this
subparagraph, "attractive to children" means the use
of any image or words designed or likely to appeal to
persons younger than eighteen (18) years of age
including, but not limited to, cartoons, toys,
ENR. H. B. NO. 4454 Page 3

animals, food, or depictions of persons younger than
eighteen (18) years of age, any other likeness to
images, characters, or phrases that are popularly used
to advertise to persons younger than eighteen (18)
years of age, or any reasonable likeness to
commercially available candy,
b. be manufactured in the shape of humans, cartoons, or
animals, or
c. be manufactured in a form that bears any reasonable
resemblance to products available for consumption as
commercially available candy.
D. The Authority shall oversee the inspection and compliance of
licensed processors producing products with marijuana as an
additive. If it becomes permissible under federal law, marijuana
may be moved across state lines.
E. Any device used for the processing or consumption of medical
marijuana shall be considered legal to be sold, manufactured,
distributed and possessed. No merchant, wholesaler, manufacturer or
individual may be unduly harassed or prosecuted for selling,
manufacturing or possessing marijuana paraphernalia.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4454 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 9th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 4th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 4454 Page 5